Maryland, session 2026, HB1247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 12–201(j) through (u) of Article – Economic Development of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 12–201(k) through (v), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 348
Article – Economic Development
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Development district” means a contiguous area designated by a
resolution.
(2) “Development district” includes an extraordinary development district.
(i) “Extraordinary development district” means a development district that:
(1) is designated as such by resolution; and
(2) (I) contains at least 50 acres, on all or part of which a federal law
enforcement agency will be located; OR
(II) IS THE SITE OF AN IMMERSIVE ENTERTAINMENT VENUE.
(J) “IMMERSIVE ENTERTAINMENT VENUE” MEANS AN ENTERTAINMENT
VENUE THAT:
(1) IS OWNED BY A PRIVATE ENTITY;
(2) HAS AT LEAST 3,000 SEATS;
(3) HAS AN AGGREGATE DEVELOPMENT COST OF AT LEAST
$500,000,000; AND
(4) HAS AN IMMERSIVE EXPERIENCE WITH ADVANCED DISPLAY
TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING 4D VISUAL EFFECTS AND SPHERICAL LED SCREENS.
12–207.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e) of this section, bond proceeds
may be used only:
(1) to buy, lease, condemn, or otherwise acquire property, or an interest in
property:
(i) in the development district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable
community; or
– 3 –

Ch. 348 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) needed for a right–of–way or other easement to or from the
development district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable community;
(2) for site removal;
(3) for surveys and studies;
(4) to relocate businesses or residents;
(5) to install utilities, construct parks and playgrounds, and for other
needed improvements including:
(i) roads to, from, or in the development district;
(ii) parking; and
(iii) lighting;
(6) to construct or rehabilitate buildings for a governmental purpose or use;
(7) for reserves or capitalized interest;
(8) for necessary costs to issue bonds; and
(9) to pay the principal of and interest on loans, advances, or indebtedness
that a political subdivision incurs for a purpose specified in this section.
(c) (1) In addition to the purposes listed in subsection (a) of this section, the
proceeds from bonds that Prince George’s County or the revenue authority of Prince
George’s County issues may be used:
(i) for convention, conference, or visitors’ centers;
(II) FOR THE ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, OR
REHABILITATION OF AN IMMERSIVE ENTERTAINMENT VENUE LOCATED WITHIN AN
EXTRAORDINARY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
[(ii)] (III) to maintain infrastructure improvements and convention,
conference, or visitors’ centers;
[(iii)] (IV) to market development district facilities and other
improvements; and
[(iv)] (V) for the purpose of encouraging redevelopment in those
areas listed in paragraph (2) of this subsection, to install infrastructure improvements,
including:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 348
1. streets;
2. parking structures of any type whether for public or
private use;
3. utilities;
4. street lights;
5. stormwater management and storm drain facilities;
6. fencing;
7. noise walls;
8. retaining walls;
9. trails;
10. sidewalks;
11. pedestrian and vehicular bridges; and
12. park facilities.
(2) The purpose of the authority granted by paragraph [(1)(iv)] (1)(V) of
this subsection is to encourage redevelopment in:
(i) revitalization areas designated by the county;
(ii) mixed use centers;
(iii) blighted areas; and
(iv) the Developed Tier, growth corridors, and growth centers, as
defined in the county General Plan.
12–210.
(a) (3) (i) This paragraph applies only in Prince George’s County.
(ii) Subject to § 18–310 of the Land Use Article AND
NOTWITHSTANDING §§ 18–304, 18–306(D), AND 18–307(B) OF THE LAND USE
ARTICLE, the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission may enter into
an agreement with Prince George’s County to pay all or a portion of the property taxes
– 5 –

Ch. 348 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
levied by the county under §§ 18–304, 18–306, and 18–307 of the Land Use Article on the
tax increment in an extraordinary development district in the county to the county for
deposit into a special fund for the extraordinary development district AND TO PLEDGE
THOSE TAXES AS SECURITY FOR BONDS ISSUED BY PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(iii) The agreement authorized under subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph shall:
1. be in writing; and
2. be executed by the governing body of Prince George’s
County and, on proper authorization, the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission.
(iv) The Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission
may not be an obligor for any bonds issued by Prince George’s County for an extraordinary
development district.
(b) The governing body of Prince George’s County may also pledge hotel rental
tax revenues to the special fund.
Article – Land Use
18–310.
The Commission may not enter into an agreement with Prince George’s County to
pay AND PLEDGE AS SECURITY all or a portion of the property taxes levied by the county
under §§ 18–304, 18–306, and 18–307 of this subtitle on the tax increment in an
extraordinary development district in the county to the county for deposit into a special
fund for an extraordinary development district under § 12–210 of the Economic
Development Article until:
(1) the governing body of Prince George’s County has adopted a resolution
designating the extraordinary development district; and
(2) the Commission has adopted a resolution approving the agreement.
25–214.
FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPLIANCE UNDER SUBTITLE 27 OF THE PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY ZONING ORDINANCES, IF ANY VISUAL EFFECTS ARE DISPLAYED
ON THE EXTERIOR OF AN IMMERSIVE ENTERTAINMENT VENUE, AS DEFINED IN §
12–201 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE, THE VISUAL EFFECTS MAY NOT
BE CONSIDERED A SIGN.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 348
Article – Transportation
8–706.
FOR AN IMMERSIVE ENTERTAINMENT VENUE, AS DEFINED IN § 12–201 OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE, THE SECRETARY MAY GRANT WAIVERS OR
EXCEPTIONS TO ANY PROVISION IN THIS SUBTITLE THAT REQUIRES STATE
APPROVAL.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026 is an emergency measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health or safety, has been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the
members elected to each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect
from the date it is enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 7 –